Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.780

[Art. 117] Provoking speeches or gestures.

Any person subject to this code who uses provoking or reproachful words or gestures toward any other person subject to this code shall be punished as a court martial may direct.

[ 1963 c 220 s 114.]